Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5022.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3801. (1) A building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or place is a nuisance if 1 or more of the following apply: (a) It is used for the purpose of lewdness, assignation, prostitution, commercial sexual activity, or gambling. (b) It is used by, or kept for the use of, prostitutes persons who provide or offer to provide commercial sexual activity or other disorderly persons. (c) It is used for the unlawful manufacture, transporting, sale, keeping for sale, bartering, or furnishing of a controlled substance. (d) It is used for the unlawful manufacture, transporting, sale, keeping for sale, bartering, or furnishing of vinous, malt, brewed, fermented, spirituous, or intoxicating liquors or mixed liquors or beverages, any part of which is intoxicating. (e) It is used for conduct prohibited by section 49 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.49. (f) It is used for conduct prohibited by chapter LXVIIA of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.462a to 750.462h. (g) It is used to facilitate armed violence in connection with the unlawful use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon. (2) All furniture, fixtures, and contents of a building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or place described in subsection (1) and all intoxicating liquors in the building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or place are also declared a nuisance. (3) All controlled substances and nuisances shall must be enjoined and abated as provided in this act and the court rules. (4) A person, or a servant, agent, or employee of the person, who owns, leases, conducts, or maintains a building, vehicle, or place described in subsection (1) is guilty of a nuisance. (5) As used in this section, "controlled substance" means that term as defined in section 7104 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7104. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5016 (request no. H04060'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.